Massachusetts, session 194th, H2718.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of Chapter 6E (a) of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting after the
words “Massachusetts Bar Association” the words: “2 of whom shall be appointed from a list of
6 nominations submitted by law enforcement labor organizations”
of 1